dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="B/ank__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änke</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änke</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änken</l>   <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änke</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>anken</l>   <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>anken</l>   <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>anken</l>   <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>anken</l>   <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Sitzb/ank__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ank</l>     <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änke</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änke</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änken</l>   <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>änke</l>    <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="B/art__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>art</l>     <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>arts</l>    <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>art</l>     <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>art</l>     <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ärte</l>    <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ärte</l>    <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ärten</l>   <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ärte</l>    <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>artes</l>   <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>arte</l>    <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Bas/is__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>is</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>is</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>is</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>is</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Bau__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>es</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Hausbau__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ten</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="B/auch__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>auch</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>auchs</l>   <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>auch</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>auch</l>    <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äuche</l>   <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äuche</l>   <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äuchen</l>  <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äuche</l>   <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>auches</l>  <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>auche</l>   <r>auch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Abbau"><i>Abbau</i><par n="Hausbau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Anbau"><i>Anbau</i><par n="Hausbau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Anklagebank"><i>Anklageb</i><par n="Sitzb/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Aufbau"><i>Aufbau</i><par n="Hausbau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ausbau"><i>Ausbau</i><par n="Hausbau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bank"><i>B</i><par n="B/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bart"><i>B</i><par n="B/art__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Basis"><i>Bas</i><par n="Bas/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bau"><i>Bau</i><par n="Bau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bauch"><i>B</i><par n="B/auch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Brauch"><i>Br</i><par n="B/auch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Einbau"><i>Einbau</i><par n="Hausbau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fahrpraxis"><i>Fahrprax</i><par n="Bas/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fensterbank"><i>Fensterb</i><par n="Sitzb/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gebrauch"><i>Gebr</i><par n="B/auch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Geschworenenbank"><i>Geschworenenb</i><par n="Sitzb/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Hausbau"><i>Hausbau</i><par n="Hausbau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Metropolis"><i>Metropol</i><par n="Bas/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Missbrauch"><i>Missbr</i><par n="B/auch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Parkbank"><i>Parkb</i><par n="Sitzb/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Praxis"><i>Prax</i><par n="Bas/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schnurrbart"><i>Schnurrb</i><par n="B/art__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sitzbank"><i>Sitzb</i><par n="Sitzb/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sprachgebrauch"><i>Sprachgebr</i><par n="B/auch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Überdosis"><i>Überdos</i><par n="Bas/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Verbrauch"><i>Verbr</i><par n="B/auch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zahnarztpraxis"><i>Zahnarztprax</i><par n="Bas/is__n"/></e>
